Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-307
Distributor, defined.

Distributor shall mean any person licensed pursuant to section 9-330, who purchases or otherwise obtains pickle card units from manufacturers and sells, distributes, or otherwise provides pickle card units in this state to licensed organizations.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 73;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 65.